Iowa, session 2025-2026, SSB1162.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 5 TLSB 2559XC (1) 91 th/ns S.F. _____ Section 1. Section 321.34, Code 2025, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 11E. Gadsden flag plates. 3 a. Upon application and payment of the proper fees, the 4 director may issue Gadsden flag plates to the owner of a 5 motor vehicle subject to registration under section 321.109, 6 subsection 1, autocycle, motor truck, motor home, multipurpose 7 vehicle, motorcycle, trailer, or travel trailer. 8 b. Gadsden flag plates shall be designed by the department. 9 The background shall be yellow at the top and bottom, with the 10 color fading into white in the center. The plateâs numbers 11 and letters shall be black. The left side of the plate shall 12 depict a black and white rattlesnake coiled on green grass. 13 The image depicting the coiled rattlesnake shall be at least 14 three inches tall and two inches wide. The phrase âDonât Tread 15 on Meâ shall appear at the bottom of the plate. 16 c. The special Gadsden flag fee for letter-number designated 17 Gadsden flag plates is fifty dollars. An applicant may obtain 18 personalized Gadsden flag plates upon payment of the fee for 19 personalized plates as provided in subsection 5, which is in 20 addition to the special Gadsden flag fee. Personalized plates 21 authorized by this subsection shall be limited to no more 22 than five numerals, letters, or combinations of numerals and 23 letters. 24 d. The fees collected by the director under this subsection 25 shall be paid monthly to the treasurer of state and deposited 26 in the road use tax fund. The treasurer of state shall 27 transfer monthly from the statutory allocations fund created 28 under section 321.145, subsection 2, to the general fund of 29 the state an amount equal to the special fees collected in 30 the previous month for Gadsden flag plates, minus one dollar 31 per issuance or renewal of the plates that month. Such 32 moneys are appropriated to the department of public safety 33 to distribute in the form of grants to provide education and 34 training on the right to keep and bear arms protected under 35 -1- LSB 2559XC (1) 91 th/ns 1/ 5 S.F. _____ the Constitution of the United States and the Constitution of 1 the State of Iowa, and training on firearm safety. In the 2 awarding of grants, the department of public safety shall give 3 first consideration to any official state association of the 4 national rifle association and similar nonprofit organizations. 5 Notwithstanding section 8.33, moneys appropriated under this 6 subsection shall not revert to the general fund of the state. 7 e. Upon receipt of the special registration plates, the 8 applicant shall surrender the current registration plates to 9 the county treasurer. The county treasurer shall validate 10 the special registration plates in the same manner as regular 11 registration plates are validated under this section. The 12 annual special Gadsden flag fee for letter-number designated 13 plates is fifty dollars which shall be paid in addition to 14 the regular annual registration fee. The annual fee for 15 personalized Gadsden flag plates is five dollars which shall be 16 paid in addition to the annual special Gadsden flag fee and the 17 regular annual registration fee. The annual special Gadsden 18 flag fee shall be credited as provided under paragraph âdâ . 19 f. The department shall not condition the issuance of 20 Gadsden flag plates on the receipt of any number of orders for 21 Gadsden flag plates. 22 Sec. 2. Section 321.37, subsection 3, Code 2025, is amended 23 to read as follows: 24 3. It is unlawful for the The owner of a vehicle to shall 25 not place any a frame around or over the a registration plate 26 which does not permit full view of all numerals and letters 27 printed on the registration plate , other than the name of the 28 county . 29 Sec. 3. Section 321.166, subsections 2 and 9, Code 2025, are 30 amended to read as follows: 31 2. Every registration plate or pair of plates shall display 32 a registration plate number which shall consist of alphabetical 33 or numerical characters or a combination thereof and the name 34 of this state, which may be abbreviated. Every registration 35 -2- LSB 2559XC (1) 91 th/ns 2/ 5 S.F. _____ plate issued by the county treasurer shall display the name 1 of the county, including any plate issued pursuant to section 2 321.34 , except Pearl Harbor and purple heart registration 3 plates issued prior to January 1, 1997; and collegiate, fire 4 fighter, and medal of honor , and Gadsden flag registration 5 plates. Special truck registration plates shall display the 6 word âspecialâ. The department may adopt rules to implement 7 this subsection . 8 9. Special registration plates issued pursuant to section 9 321.34 , other than gold star, medal of honor, collegiate, fire 10 fighter, natural resources, blackout, and flying our colors , 11 and Gadsden flag registration plates, shall be consistent with 12 the design and color of regular registration plates but shall 13 provide a space on a portion of the plate for the purpose of 14 allowing the placement of a distinguishing processed emblem or 15 an organization decal. Special registration plates shall also 16 comply with the requirements for regular registration plates 17 as provided in this section to the extent the requirements are 18 consistent with the section authorizing a particular special 19 vehicle registration plate. 20